Hawaii statutes.
§603-14 Place of trial; signature of judge.
(a) A jury trial shall be conducted in the circuit in which the case is
pending, at the place designated by section 603-12 or at such other place or
places within the circuit as may be designated by the chief justice from time
to time.

(b) For the trial of cases which do not
require a jury the circuit court may hold sessions at any place within the
circuit with the same effect as if held at the place designated by section
603-12.

(c) In any ex parte proceeding, or any other
civil proceeding upon consent of all the parties who have appeared in the case,
the circuit court may in its discretion, if the attendance of a jury is not
required, hold sessions at which witnesses may be heard and evidence adduced and
argument presented, at any place within the State without the boundaries of the
circuit with the same effect as if held at the place designated by section
603-12, and for the purpose of such sessions may use the services of the clerk
and reporter of the circuit court of the circuit within which the sessions are
held, and may require stipulations between the parties as to the payment of
costs of transportation and other special costs arising out of the fact that
the sessions are held at a place other than that designated by section 603-12,
as a condition of holding the sessions.

(d) Any decision, order, decree, judgment, or
any other document requiring the signature of a circuit judge, in any cause or
proceeding whatsoever in a circuit court, may be signed without, as well as
within, the boundaries of the circuit in which the court is situated. [L 1892,
c 57, §33; RL 1925, §2246; RL 1935, §3642; am L 1943, c 141, §1(c); RL 1945,
§9640; am L 1947, c 134, §1; RL 1955, §215-10; am L 1959, c 201, §1; HRS §603-14;
am L 1972, c 88, §3(f)]

Rules of Court

As to when courts deemed open, see HRCP rule 77(a) and HRPP
rule 56.

As to where acts or proceedings may take place, see HRCP
rules 77(b), 82.

Case Notes

"Trial" within the meaning of this section does not
include appeal from magistrate on points of law. 24 H. 12, 14 (1917).

Cited: 26 H. 667, 671 (1922).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next